Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.64.010

Private trusts and private trust companies exempt—Exception for change of control.

(1) A private trust or private trust company is exempt from the requirement of a certificate of authority or regulation under this title.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a transfer or change of control of a private trust or private trust company to a person or persons other than family members constitutes unauthorized trust activity unless the resulting private trust company is a trust institution authorized to do business in this state.

[ 2014 c 37 s 398.]